Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2244.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 204 OF THE ACT OF MARCH 4, 1971 (P.L.6, NO.2), KNOWN AS THE TAX REFORM CODE OF 1971, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A CLAUSE TO READ:SECTION 204. EXCLUSIONS FROM TAX.--THE TAX IMPOSED BY SECTION 202 SHALL NOT BE IMPOSED UPON ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:* * *<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021 (77) THE SALE AT RETAIL OR USE OF A GUN SAFE OR GUN LOCK. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS CLAUSE, THE FOLLOWING TERMS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING MEANINGS:"GUN LOCK" SHALL HAVE THE SAME MEANING AS THE TERM "LOCKING DEVICE" AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 6142(F) (RELATING TO LOCKING DEVICE FOR FIREARMS)."GUN SAFE" MEANS A SELF-CONTAINED ENCLOSURE SPECIFICALLY DESIGNED AND MANUFACTURED FOR THE PURPOSE OF SECURELY STORING A FIREARM AND EQUIPPED WITH A PADLOCK, KEY LOCK, COMBINATION LOCK, KEYPAD, ELECTRONIC KEYPAD, BIOMETRIC SCANNER OR SIMILAR MECHANISM THAT, WHEN PROPERLY LOCKED, PREVENTS UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO THE FIREARM. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A GUN CABINET.SECTION 2. TITLE 18 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:§ 6143. Unauthorized access to firearms.(a) Secure storage required.--A possessor of a firearm shall ensure that the firearm is securely stored when not in use. For the purpose of this subsection, a firearm is considered to be securely stored when not in use if the firearm is carried by the possessor or within close proximity to the possessor so that the possessor can readily retrieve the firearm and prevent unauthorized users from gaining access to the firearm as if the possessor carried the firearm.(b) Grading.--A violation of subsection (a) shall be graded as follows:(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a summary offense with no term of imprisonment.(2) For a person who knew or should have reasonably known that a minor or unauthorized user was present or likely to be present in the area where the firearm was left 20260HB2244PN3545 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unsecured, a misdemeanor of the third degree.(c) Civil liability.--A person whose act or omission constitutes a violation of subsection (a), regardless of whether there has been a criminal prosecution, shall be strictly liable for damages in any civil action in which a party claims bodily injury or property damage resulting from the possession or use of the person's unsecured firearm.(d) Affirmative defense.--It is an affirmative defense to criminal prosecution and civil liability under this section if a minor or unauthorized user gained possession of the firearm as a result of an unlawful entry by a person or through a lawful act of self-defense.(e) Notice by retailer.--(1) A person who offers for sale at retail a firearm shall post in a conspicuous place and at all times display in block letters not less than three inches in height the following notice:Unless lawfully carried on your person, you are required by law to securely store your firearm(s). A failure to securely store your firearm(s) may result in criminal or civil liability.(2) A violation of this subsection constitutes a misdemeanor of the third degree.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Firearm." As defined under section 908(c) (relating to prohibited offensive weapons)."Gun safe." A self-contained enclosure specifically designed and manufactured for the purpose of securely storing a firearm 20260HB2244PN3545 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and equipped with a padlock, key lock, combination lock, keypad, electronic keypad, biometric scanner or similar mechanism that, when properly locked, prevents unauthorized access to the firearm. The term does not include a gun cabinet."Locking device." As defined under section 6142(f) (relating to locking device for firearms)."Minor." An individual under 18 years of age."Securely store." Provided that the key or combination, if any, are kept separately from the gun safe or locking device, either of the following:(1) storing a firearm in a properly locked gun safe; or(2) storing a firearm out of plain sight with a properly engaged locking device."Unauthorized user." A person who is ineligible to purchase or possess a firearm under Federal law or section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms) or to whom the owner has not expressly granted permission to use the firearm.Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2244PN3545 - 4 - <--12345678910111213141516171819